Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-3529
Hospital districts; establish.

Whenever it shall be conducive to the public health and welfare, a local hospital district may be established in the manner and having the powers and duties provided in sections 23-3528 to 23-3552.

Laws 1959, c. 83, § 1, p. 375;

R.S.1943, (1987), § 23-343.20.

County board is given power to determine if proposed district will be conducive to public health and welfare. Syfie v. Tri-County Hospital Dist., 186 Neb. 478, 184 N.W.2d 398 (1971).